District of Columbia statutes.
31-4440

Manner of keeping books, records, accounts, and vouchers.

Every domestic company shall keep its books, records, accounts, and vouchers in such manner that its financial condition can be ascertained and so that its financial statements filed with the Commissioner can be readily verified.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1154, ch. 672, ch. III, § 39
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 24(c), 45 DCR 745
Hospital and medical services corporations, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.
Managing general agents, retention of contract records, see § 31-1503.
This section is referenced in § 31-1503 and § 31-3503.
1981 Ed., § 35-637.
1973 Ed., § 35-539.